Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
PART 10
COLORADO IMPLEMENTATION PROVISIONS

14-5-1001. Venue. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1602, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 753, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was amended by House Bill 98-1183. Those amendments will not become effective because of the repeal of the section by Senate Bill 98-139.

14-5-1002. Jurisdiction by arrest. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1602, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 754, § 3, effective July 1.

14-5-1003. Duty of officials of this state as responding state. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1603, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 754, § 4, effective July 1.

14-5-1004. Proceedings not to be stayed. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1603, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 593, § 5, effective July 1.

14-5-1005. Declaration of reciprocity - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1603, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2003:

(b) added by revision, pp. 1263, 1275, §§ 48, 72.

Editor's note:

(1) This section was similar to former § 14-5-144 as it existed prior to 1993.

(2) Subsection (b) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 1263, 1275.)

14-5-1006. Interstate central registry - duties as the responding and initiating state - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1604, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 2644, § 103, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3) added by revision, pp. 1264, 1275, §§ 49, 72.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 1264, 1275.)

14-5-1007. Enforcement of interstate income withholding. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1547, § 27, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(4) and (5)(a) amended, p. 593, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(2)(e)(I) amended, p. 1264, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 754, § 5, effective July 1.